New Jersey, session 221, S4524.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   There is appropriated to the State Agriculture Development Committee the sum of $34,000,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 8 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-50), for the purpose of providing planning incentive grants to counties pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1) for up to 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of development easements on farmland for projects approved as eligible for such funding pursuant to this section. b.    The following applicants are eligible for funding with the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section for eligible projects located in an agricultural development area approved pursuant to section 11 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-18): Applicant (County) Municipality Amount of Grant Burlington County Bass River Twp Bordentown Twp Burlington Twp Chesterfield Twp Cinnaminson Twp Eastampton Twp Evesham Twp Florence Twp Hainesport Twp Lumberton Twp Mansfield Twp Medford Twp Moorestown Twp Mount Laurel Twp New Hanover Twp North Hanover Twp Pemberton Boro Pemberton Twp Shamong Twp Southampton Twp Springfield Twp Tabernacle Twp Washington Twp Westampton Twp Woodland Twp 1,000,000 Cumberland County Commercial Twp Deerfield Twp Downe Twp Fairfield Twp Greenwich Twp Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Maurice River Twp Millville City Shiloh Boro Stow Creek Twp Upper Deerfield Twp Vineland City 500,000 Gloucester County Clayton Boro Deptford Twp East Greenwich Twp Elk Twp Franklin Twp Glassboro Boro Greenwich Twp Harrison Twp Logan Twp Mantua Twp Monroe Twp Newfield Boro South Harrison Twp Washington Twp West Deptford Twp Woolwich Twp 1,000,000 Monmouth County Allentown Boro Colts Neck Twp Farmingdale Boro Freehold Twp Holmdel Twp Howell Twp Manalapan Twp Marlboro Twp Middletown Twp Millstone Twp Roosevelt Boro Upper Freehold Twp Wall Twp 500,000 Somerset County Bedminster Twp Bernards Twp Bernardsville Boro Branchburg Twp Bridgewater Twp Far Hills Boro Franklin Twp Hillsborough Twp Millstone Boro Montgomery Twp Peapack-Gladstone Boro Warren Twp 1,000,000 TOTAL $4,000,000 c.     (1)        In addition to the funding provided pursuant to subsection b. of this section, each applicant identified in subsection b. of this section shall be eligible, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Agriculture Development Committee providing for a county planning incentive grant program competitive grant fund, to receive a grant not to exceed $7,500,000 from the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (2)   The following applicants shall be eligible, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Agriculture Development Committee providing for a county planning incentive grant program competitive grant fund, to receive a grant not to exceed $7,500,000 from the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section for eligible projects located in an agricultural development area approved pursuant to section 11 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-18): Applicant (County) Municipality Bergen County Allendale Boro Closter Boro Emerson Boro Franklin Lakes Boro Hillsdale Boro Mahwah Twp Montvale Boro Norwood Boro Oakland Boro Old Tappan Boro Paramus Boro Saddle River Boro Woodcliff Lake Boro Wyckoff Twp Camden County Berlin Boro Berlin Twp Cherry Hill Twp Gloucester Twp Voorhees Twp Waterford Twp Winslow Twp Cape May County Dennis Twp Lower Twp Middle Twp Upper Twp West Cape May Boro Woodbine Boro Hunterdon County Alexandria Twp Bethlehem Twp Califon Boro Clinton Twp Delaware Twp East Amwell Twp Franklin Twp Glen Gardner Boro Hampton Boro Holland Twp Kingwood Twp Lebanon Boro Lebanon Twp Milford Boro Raritan Twp Readington Twp Stockton Boro Tewksbury Twp Union Twp West Amwell Twp Mercer County East Windsor Twp Hamilton Twp Hopewell Boro Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Princeton Boro Robbinsville Twp West Windsor Twp Middlesex County Cranbury Twp East Brunswick Twp Monroe Twp Old Bridge Twp Plainsboro Twp Sayreville Boro South Brunswick Twp Morris County Boonton Twp Chester Boro Chester Twp Denville Twp Harding Twp Lincoln Park Boro Long Hill Twp Mendham Boro Mendham Twp Montville Twp Mount Olive Twp Randolph Twp Rockaway Twp Washington Twp Salem County Alloway Twp Carneys Point Twp Elsinboro Twp Lower Alloways Creek Twp Mannington Twp Oldmans Twp Pilesgrove Twp Pittsgrove Twp Quinton Twp Upper Pittsgrove Twp Sussex County Andover Boro Andover Twp Byram Twp Frankford Twp Fredon Twp Green Twp Hampton Twp Hardyston Twp Lafayette Twp Montague Twp Sandyston Twp Sparta Twp Stillwater Twp Vernon Twp Wantage Twp Warren County Allamuchy Twp Alpha Boro Belvidere Town Blairstown Twp Franklin Twp Frelinghuysen Twp Greenwich Twp Hardwick Twp Harmony Twp Hope Twp Independence Twp Knowlton Twp Liberty Twp Lopatcong Twp Mansfield Twp Oxford Twp Phillipsburg Town Pohatcong Twp Washington Twp White Twp (3)   (a)   The total expenditure by the State Agriculture Development Committee pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed $30,000,000. (b)   The maximum grant award an applicant identified in subsection b. of this section may receive pursuant to the funding provided by subsection b. of this section and paragraph (1) of this subsection is $8,500,000. (c)   The maximum grant award an applicant identified in paragraph (2) of this subsection may receive pursuant to the funding provided by this subsection is $7,500,000. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 8 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-50), the sum of $34,000,000 to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    The expenditure of the sum appropriated by this act is subject to the provisions and conditions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.), P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1), P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et seq.), and P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), as appropriate. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.